cs: Styl lžíce: Nahazovací; Mihotavé; Na dírky; Jiggové; Dělené; Hladinové; Trollingové; Proti váznutí (weedless); Jiné
hu: Kanálstílus: Dobó; Flutter; Lékhorgász; Jigging; Csuklós; Felszíni; Vontatott (trolling); Bokorugró; Egyéb
vi: Kiểu thìa: Ném (Casting); Rơi lảo đảo (Flutter); Câu cá trên băng; Nhấp (Jigging); Có khớp; Mặt nước; Câu kéo (Trolling); Chống vướng (Weedless); Khác
zh-CN: 勺子式: 抛投型; 飘落型; 冰钓型; 铁板型; 分节型; 水面型; 拖钓型; 防挂草型; 其他
en: Spoon style: Casting; Flutter; Ice fishing; Jigging; Jointed; Surface; Trolling; Weedless; Other
ro-RO: Stilul lingurii de pescuit: Casting; Flutter; Pescuit la copcă; Jigging; Articulat; De suprafață; Trolling; Antibrădiș; Altele
nb: Skjestil: Kasting; Flakkesluk; Isfiske; Pilk; Leddet; Overflate; Dorging; Sivbeskyttet; Annet
el: Τύπος spoon (δόλωμα τύπου κουταλιού): Ρίψης (Casting); Flutter; Ψαρέματος σε πάγο; Jigging; Σπαστό; Επιφανείας; Συρτής (Trolling); Κατά των σκαλωμάτων; Άλλο
sk-SK: Lyžicový štýl: Castingové; Plandavky; Lov na dierkach; Jigové; Delené; Hladinové; Prívlačové; Proti uviaznutiu; Iné
pt-BR: Estilo da isca colher: Arremesso; Flutter; Pesca no gelo; Jigging; Articulada; Superfície; Corrico; Antienrosco; Outro
ko: 스푼 방식: 캐스팅; 플러터; 얼음 낚시; 지깅; 조인티드; 수면; 트롤링; 위드리스; 기타
ru: Стиль блесны spoon: Для кастинга; Колеблющаяся; Для зимней рыбалки; Для джиггинга; Составная; Поверхностная; Для троллинга; Незацепляйка; Другое
it: Stile del cucchiaio: Casting; Flutter; Pesca nel ghiaccio; Jigging; Snodato; Superficie; Traina; Antialga; Altro
de: Art des Blinkerlöffels: Casting; Flutter; Eisangeln; Jigging; Geteilt; Oberfläche; Trolling; Krautfrei; Sonstige
sl-SI: Stil žlice: Metanje; Trepetanje; Ledeni ribolov; Jigging; Večdelni; Površinsko; Panuliranje; Brez zapenjanja; Drugo
zh-TW: 湯匙樣式: 拋投路亞; 飄落路亞; 冰釣; 鐵板路亞; 多節; 水面; 拖釣; 防纏; 其他
fi: Lusikkauistimen tyyli: Heittolusikka; Värisevä lusikka; Pilkkilusikka; Jigilusikka; Nivelletty; Pintalusikka; Vetouistelulusikka; Ruohikkolusikka; Muu
th: สไตล์ช้อน: แคสติ้ง; ฟลัตเตอร์; ตกปลาน้ำแข็ง; จิ๊กกิ้ง; มีข้อต่อ; ผิวน้ำ; ทรอลลิ่ง; กันสวะ; อื่นๆ
pl: Styl błystki: Rzutowa; Migotliwa; Podlodowa; Do jigowania; Łamana; Powierzchniowa; Trollingowa; Antyzaczepowa; Inne
nl: Lepel stijl: Casting; Flutter; IJsvissen; Jiggen; Geleed; Oppervlakte; Trollen; Wierloos; Overige
sv: Skedstil: Kastsked; Fladdersked; Pimpelsked; Jiggsked; Ledad; Ytsked; Trollingsked; Vasskyddad; Övrigt
es: Estilos de cucharas: Lanzamiento; Oscilante; Pesca en hielo; Jigging; Articulado; Superficie; Curricán; Antialgas; Otro
hr-HR: Stil žlice: Za zabacivanje (casting); Flutter; Za pecanje na ledu; Za jigging; Dvodijelna; Površinska; Za panulanje; Weedless (bez zapinjanja); Ostalo
fr: Type de cuiller: À lancer; Ondulante; Pêche sur glace; À dandiner; Articulée; De surface; À la traîne; Anti-herbe; Autre
da: Skestil: Kaste; Flagrende; Isfiskeri; Pirkefiskeri; Todelt; Overflade; Trolling; Grødefri; Andet
lt-LT: Blizgės tipas: Užmetama; Plazdanti; Poledinės žūklės; Džigavimo; Nariuota; Paviršinė; Velkiavimo; Neprikimbanti prie žolių; Kita
bg-BG: Стил на лъжицата: За кастинг; Трептяща; За зимен риболов; За джигинг; Съчленена; Повърхностна; За тролинг; Незацепваща; Друго
tr: Kaşık (yem) stili: At-çek; Çırpınan; Buzda balık avı; Jigging; Oynar eklemli; Su üstü; Sırtı; Takılmaz; Diğer
pt-PT: Estilo da colher: Lançamento; Oscilante; Pesca no gelo; Jigging; Articulado; Superfície; Corrico; Antialgas; Outro
ja: スプーンスタイル: キャスティング; フラッター; アイスフィッシング; ジギング; ジョイント; サーフェス; トローリング; ウィードレス; その他